Mississippi statutes. Title 53. Oil, Gas, and Other Minerals
In General

§ 53-1-1.
Declaration of policy.

It is hereby declared to be in the public interests to foster, encourage and promote the development, production and utilization of the natural resources of oil and gas in the State of Mississippi; and to protect the public and private interests against the evils of waste in the production and utilization of oil and gas, by prohibiting waste as herein defined; to safeguard, protect and enforce the coequal and correlative rights of owners in a common source or pool of oil and gas to the end that each such owner in a common pool or source of supply of oil and gas may obtain his just and equitable share of production therefrom; and to obtain, as soon as practicable, consistent with the prohibition of waste, the full development by progressive drilling of other wells in all producing pools of oil and gas or of all pools which may hereafter be brought into production of such, within the state, until such pool is fully defined.

It is not the intent nor the purpose of this law to require or permit the proration or distribution of the production of oil and gas among the fields and pools of Mississippi, on the basis of market demand. It is the intent and purpose of this law to permit each and every oil and gas pool in Mississippi to be produced up to its maximum efficient rate of production, subject to the prohibition of waste as herein defined, and subject further to the enforcement and protection of the coequal and correlative rights of the owners of a common source of oil and gas, so that each common owner may obtain his just and equitable share of production therefrom.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-01; Laws, 1948, ch. 256, § 1; Reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 485, § 1; Reenacted, Laws, 1990, ch. 357, § 1; Reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 340, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 11, 1991).

§ 53-1-3.
Definitions.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the words defined in this section shall have the following meaning when found in Sections 53-1-1 through 53-1-47, inclusive, and in Sections 53-3-3 through 53-3-21, inclusive:

“Board” shall mean the State Oil and Gas Board as created by Section 53-1-5.

“Person” shall mean any individual, corporation, partnership, association, or any state, municipality, political subdivision of any state, or any agency, department or instrumentality of the United States, or any other entity, or any officer, agent or employee of any of the above.

“Oil” shall mean crude petroleum oil and all other hydrocarbons, regardless of gravity, which are produced at the well in liquid form by ordinary production methods and which are not the result of condensation of gas.

“Gas” shall mean all natural gas, whether hydrocarbon or nonhydrocarbon or any combination or mixture thereof, including hydrocarbons, hydrogen sulphide, helium, carbon dioxide, nitrogen, hydrogen, casinghead gas, occluded natural gas from coal seams, compressed air and all other hydrocarbons not defined as oil in subsection (c) above.

“Pool” shall mean an underground reservoir containing a common accumulation of oil or gas or both. Each zone of a general structure which is completely separated from any other zone in the structure is included in the term “pool” as used herein.

“Field” shall mean the general area which is underlaid or appears to be underlaid by at least one (1) pool; and “field” shall include the underground reservoir or reservoirs containing oil or gas or both. The words “field” and “pool” mean the same thing when only one (1) underground reservoir is involved; however, “field,” unlike “pool,” may relate to two (2) or more pools.

“Owner” shall mean the person who has the right to drill into and produce from any pool, and to appropriate the production either for himself or for himself and another or others; “royalty owner” shall mean any person who possesses an interest in the production but who is not an “owner” as herein defined.

“Producer” shall mean the owner of a well or wells capable of producing oil or gas or both.

“Product” shall mean any commodity made from oil or gas, and shall include refined crude oil, processed crude petroleum, residuum from crude petroleum, cracking stock, uncracked fuel oil, fuel oil, treated crude oil, residuum, casinghead gasoline, natural gas gasoline, naphtha, distillate, gasoline, kerosene, waste oil, blended gasoline, lubricating oil, blends or mixtures of oil with one or more liquid products or by-products derived from oil or gas, and blends or mixtures of two (2) or more liquid products or by-products derived from oil, condensate, gas or petroleum hydrocarbons, whether hereinabove enumerated or not.

“Underground Injection Program” shall mean a program regulating the injection of any fluids produced or fluids associated with the exploration, storage and/or production of oil and/or gas and being among those other laws relating to the conservation of oil and gas as referred to in Section 53-1-17(a).

“Illegal oil and illegal gas” shall mean oil or gas which has been produced within the State of Mississippi from any well during any time that the well has produced in excess of the amount allowed by law or by any rule, regulation or order of the board. “Illegal product” shall mean any product derived, in whole or in part, from illegal oil or illegal gas.

“Waste” shall mean and include the following:

The inefficient, excessive or improper use or dissipation of reservoir energy; and the locating, spacing, drilling, equipping, operating or producing of any oil or gas well or wells in a manner which results or tends to result in reducing the quantity of oil or gas ultimately to be recovered from any pool in this state.

The inefficient storing of oil; and the locating, spacing, drilling, equipping, operating or producing of any oil or gas well or wells in a manner causing or tending to cause unnecessary or excessive surface loss or destruction of oil or gas.

Abuse of the correlative rights and opportunities of each owner of oil or gas in a pool due to nonuniform, disproportionate, or unratable withdrawals causing undue drainage between tracts of land or resulting in one or more owners in such pool producing more than his just and equitable share of the production from such pool.

Producing oil or gas in such manner as to cause unnecessary channeling of water or gas or both or coning of water.

The operation of any oil well or wells with an inefficient gas-oil ratio.

The drowning with water of any stratum or part thereof capable of producing oil or gas.

The creation of unnecessary fire hazards.

The escape into the open air, from a well producing both oil and gas, of gas in excess of the amount which is necessary in the efficient drilling or operation of the well.

Permitting gas produced from a gas well to escape into open air.

The use of gas from gas wells, except sour gas, for the manufacture of carbon black, except and unless the board shall find that there are no adequate pipeline connections to otherwise market the gas.

“Drainage unit” or “drilling unit” shall mean the maximum area in a pool which may be assigned to one (1) well so as to produce the reasonably recoverable oil or gas in such area, shall be established by statewide rules or by special field rules of the board, and shall be of such size and configuration as will foster, encourage and promote the development, production and utilization of the natural resource of oil and gas.

“Developed area” or “developed unit” shall mean a drainage unit having a well completed therein which is capable of producing oil or gas in paying quantities.

A “certificate of compliance” shall mean a certificate issued by the board showing compliance with the conservation laws of the state, and conservation rules, regulations and orders of the board, prior to connection with a pipeline.

A “certificate of clearance” shall mean a permit for the transportation or the delivery of oil, gas or products, approved and issued or registered under the authority of the board.

“Supervisor” or “State Oil and Gas Supervisor” shall mean the officer appointed by the State Oil and Gas Board pursuant to Section 53-1-7.

“Orphan well” shall mean any oil or gas well in the state, including Class II wells, which has not been properly plugged according to the requirements of the statutes, rules and regulations governing same and for which a responsible party such as an owner or operator cannot be located or for which, for whatever reason, there is no other party which can be forced to plug the well.

“Refined hydrocarbons” shall mean any refined petroleum products.

“Oil field exploration and production wastes” shall mean:

Any liquid, gaseous, solid, naturally occurring radioactive, or other substance(s), including but not limited to, any chemical, produced water, sludge, oil-water emulsion, oil field brine, waste oil, sediment, scale or other waste substance(s);

Any equipment or any other related apparatus containing or contaminated with such substance(s) as set forth in subparagraph (i) above; or

Any land or structures containing or contaminated with such substance(s) as set forth in subparagraph (i) above, which is associated with, produced by, or used in the exploration, drilling, and/or production of oil, gas or other minerals within the territorial limits of the State of Mississippi.

“Noncommercial disposal of oil field exploration and production waste” shall mean the storage, treatment, recovery, processing, disposal or acceptance of oil field exploration and production waste which is not commercial oil field exploration and production waste disposal as defined in Section 17-17-3.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-08; Laws, 1948, ch. 256, § 4; Laws, 1979, ch. 344; Reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 485, § 2; Laws, 1988, ch. 496; Laws, 1989, ch. 444, § 1; Reenacted and amended, Laws, 1990, ch. 357, § 12; Reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 340, § 2; Laws, 1991, ch. 344 § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 344 § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 356, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 53-1-5.
Board created.

There is hereby created and established a board to be known as the State Oil and Gas Board composed of five (5) members. One (1) member shall be appointed by the Lieutenant Governor for a term of four (4) years, and one (1) member shall be appointed by the Attorney General of the State of Mississippi for a term of four (4) years, which said two (2) members shall be appointed, one (1) from each of the United States district court districts. From and after April 15, 1992, such appointments by the Lieutenant Governor and the Attorney General shall be from the state at large rather than each United States district court district. Three (3) members shall be appointed by the Governor, one (1) from each of the Supreme Court districts for terms of the following duration: one (1) member from the First Supreme Court District for a term of two (2) years; one (1) member from the Second Supreme Court District for a term of four (4) years; and one (1) member from the Third Supreme Court District for a term of six (6) years.

At the expiration of the term of the members appointed by the Lieutenant Governor and Attorney General, each successor member shall be appointed for a term of four (4) years by the incumbent of the respective office. At the expiration of a term for which each of the original appointments of the Governor is made, each successor member shall be appointed for a term of six (6) years.

In the event of a vacancy, the Governor, Lieutenant Governor or Attorney General, as the case may be, shall, by appointment, fill such unexpired term. All members shall be confirmed by the Senate. Each member shall be eligible for reappointment at the discretion of the appointing officer. The board shall elect from its number a chairman and a vice-chairman. Each member of the board shall be a citizen of the United States, and a resident of the State of Mississippi, and a qualified elector therein, of integrity and sound and nonpartisan judgment. Each member shall qualify by taking the oath of office and shall hold office until his successor is appointed and qualified. The board shall establish its principal office at Jackson, Mississippi, at which the records of the board shall be kept.

Each member of the board shall receive as compensation for his services an annual salary of Seven Thousand Two Hundred Dollars ($7,200.00), except the chairman of the board who shall receive as compensation for his services an annual salary of Nine Thousand Six Hundred Dollars ($9,600.00). The receipt of said compensation shall not entitle members of the board to receive or be eligible for any state employee group insurance or retirement benefits.

The board shall meet and hold hearings at such times and places as may be found by the board, or a majority thereof, to be necessary to carry out its duties. A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum, and three (3) affirmative votes shall be necessary for adoption or promulgation of any rule, regulation or order. Any member who shall not attend three (3) consecutive regular meetings of the board, for any reason other than illness of such member, shall be removed from office by the Governor. The chairman of the board shall notify the Governor in writing when any such member has failed to attend three (3) consecutive regular meetings.

Where a question which has been presented or has arisen to be acted upon by the board directly affects the interest of a member or members of the board, such member or members shall recuse himself or themselves from acting upon such question.

The board shall adopt an official seal, and may sue and be sued.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-02; Laws, 1932, ch. 117; Laws, 1948, ch. 256, § 2; Laws, 1950, ch. 213; Laws, 1966, ch. 279, § 1; Laws, 1982, ch. 485, § 3; Laws, 1983, ch. 536, § 4; Laws, 1988, ch. 590; Reenacted, Laws, 1990, ch. 357, § 2; Reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 340, § 3; Laws, 1992, ch. 310 § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 15, 1992).

§ 53-1-7.
State supervisor.

The board shall appoint a State Oil and Gas Supervisor, herein called supervisor, who shall be a competent and qualified administrator and receive as compensation for his services an annual salary to be fixed by law. The supervisor shall be solely responsible for the administration of the offices of the State Oil and Gas Board and shall be charged with the duty of enforcing Sections 53-1-1 through 53-1-47, and Sections 53-3-3 through 53-3-165, and all rules, regulations and orders duly adopted by the board. The supervisor shall be ex officio secretary of the board and shall give bond, in such sum as the board may direct, with corporate surety to be approved by the board, conditioned that he will well and truly account for all funds coming into his hands as such secretary. He shall remit to the State Treasurer all monies collected by him as such secretary for deposit in trust for the use of the board in a special fund known as the Oil and Gas Conservation Fund to be expended as provided by law.

The supervisor shall devote his entire time to his official duties.

In addition, it shall be the supervisor’s duty and responsibility to:

Supervise and manage all personnel of the offices of the Oil and Gas Board.

Formulate the duties and responsibilities of every staff employee in detail, including written job descriptions and written policies and procedures for performing staff tasks.

Outline a detailed method of preparing, and devise a systematic procedure for the filing of reports by field inspectors.

Formulate written policies and procedures for the effective and efficient operation of the office, and present these policies and procedures to the board for promulgation.

Supervise the provision of technical support and assistance to the board in its decision-making capacity.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 6132-03, 6132-06; Laws, 1948, ch. 256, §§ 3a, 3d; Laws, 1950, ch. 220, § 1; Laws, 1982, ch. 485, § 4; Reenacted, Laws, 1990, ch. 357, § 3; Reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 340, § 4; Laws, 2016, ch. 459, § 39, eff from and after July 1, 2016; Laws, 2019, ch. 474, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 16, 2019).

§ 53-1-9.
Employees.

The supervisor shall have the authority, and it shall be his duty, to employ geologists, petroleum engineers, field inspectors and any other personnel necessary to carry out the duties and responsibilities fixed upon him. No person shall be permanently employed by the board who is not a resident and qualified elector of the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-04; Laws, 1948, ch. 256, § 3b; Laws, 1950, ch. 220, § 1; Laws, 1982, ch. 485, § 5; Reenacted, Laws, 1990, ch. 357, § 4; Reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 340, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved March 11, 1991).

§ 53-1-11.
Attorney for board.

The Attorney General shall be the attorney for the board and for the supervisor. However, the board may, from any funds available, retain additional counsel to assist the Attorney General. Any member of the board, or the secretary thereof, shall have the power to administer oaths to any witness in any hearings, investigations or proceedings contemplated by this chapter or by any other law of this state relating to the conservation of oil and gas.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-05; Laws, 1948, ch. 256, § 3c; Laws, 1950, ch. 220, § 1; Laws, 1982, ch. 485, § 6; Reenacted, Laws, 1990, ch. 357, § 5; Reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 340, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved March 11, 1991).

§ 53-1-13.
Board; employee eligibility.

No person while engaged in the business of, or in the employ of, or holding an official connection or position with, any person, firm, partnership, corporation or association engaged in the business of buying or selling mineral leases or minerals, drilling wells in search of oil or gas, producing, transporting, refining or distributing crude oil or natural gas in this state, or any other state, shall be eligible as a member of the board or as an employee thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-06; Laws, 1948, ch. 256, § 3d; Laws, 1950, ch. 220, § 1; Reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 485, § 7; Reenacted, Laws, 1990, ch. 357, § 6; Reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 340, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved March 11, 1991).

§ 53-1-15.
Expenses.

Each member of the board, its employees, and the supervisor shall be reimbursed for necessary and reasonable traveling expenses while traveling on the business of the board upon a signed itemized statement thereof approved by the board. The board may incur the necessary and reasonable expenses for the purpose of carrying out its duties and responsibilities as fixed by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-07; Laws, 1948, ch. 256, § 3e; Laws, 1950, ch. 220, § 1; Reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 485, § 8; Reenacted, Laws, 1990, ch. 357, § 7; Reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 340, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved March 11, 1991).

§ 53-1-17.
Powers of board.

The board shall have jurisdiction and authority over all persons and property necessary to enforce effectively the provisions of this chapter and all other laws relating to the conservation of oil and gas.

The board shall have the authority, and it shall be its duty, to make such inquiries as it may think proper to determine whether or not waste, over which it has jurisdiction, exists or is imminent. In the exercise of such power the board shall have the authority to collect data; to make investigations and inspections; to examine properties, leases, papers, books and records, including drilling records and logs; to examine, check, test and gauge oil and gas wells, tanks, refineries and modes of transportation; to hold hearings; to require the keeping of records and the making of reports; and to take such action as may be reasonably necessary to enforce the provisions of Sections 53-1-1 through 53-1-47, inclusive, and Sections 53-3-1 through 53-3-21, inclusive.

The board shall have the authority, and it shall be its duty, to make, after notice and hearing as hereinafter provided, such reasonable rules, regulations and orders as may be necessary from time to time in the proper administration and enforcement of the provisions of Sections 53-1-1 through 53-1-47, inclusive, and Sections 53-3-1 through 53-3-21, inclusive, and to amend the same after due notice and hearing, including but not limited to, rules, regulations and orders for the following purposes:

To require that the drilling, casing and plugging of wells be done in such a manner as to prevent the escape of oil or gas out of one stratum to another; to prevent the intrusion of water into an oil or gas stratum from a separate stratum; to prevent the pollution of freshwater supplies by oil, gas or saltwater; and generally to prevent waste as herein defined. The duty is hereby imposed upon the State Oil and Gas Board to make suitable and adequate rules and regulations, subject to the approval of the Mississippi Commission on Environmental Quality, requiring the disposal of waste products such as, but not limited to, mud, acids, saltwater or any corrosive products brought to the surface from any oil, gas or condensate well in this state, to prevent seepage, overflow or damage and injury to the topsoil or surface. The Commission on Environmental Quality shall have the exclusive authority to regulate the commercial disposal of such waste products pursuant to Section 17-17-47. However, the board shall have the exclusive authority to regulate and promulgate rules and regulations pertaining to commercial and noncommercial Class II underground injection wells. It is the policy of the state not only to conserve minerals but to conserve and protect its surface lands for agriculture, timber and any and all other beneficial purposes, and the destruction of surface lands where reasonable means of their protection exist shall no longer be permitted.

To require the making of reports showing the location of oil and gas wells; to require the filing, within thirty (30) days from the time of the completion of any wells drilled for oil or gas, of logs and drilling records.

To require adequate proof of financial responsibility in a form acceptable to the board and conditioned for the performance of the duties outlined in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, including the duty to plug each dry or abandoned well.

To prevent the drowning by water of any stratum or part thereof capable of producing oil or gas in paying quantities and to prevent the premature and irregular encroachment of water which reduces, or tends to reduce, the total ultimate recovery of oil or gas from any pool.

To require the operation of wells with efficient gas-oil ratios, and to fix the limits of such ratios.

To prevent “blowouts,” “caving” and “seepage” in the sense that conditions indicated by such terms are generally understood in the oil and gas business.

To prevent the creation of unnecessary fire hazards.

To identify the ownership of all oil and gas wells producing leases, refineries, tanks, plants, structures and storage and transportation equipment and facilities.

To regulate the shooting, perforating and chemical treatment of wells.

To regulate secondary recovery methods, including the introduction of gas, air, water or other substances into producing formations.

To regulate the spacing of wells and to establish drilling units.

To allocate and apportion the production of oil or gas, or both, from any pool or field for the prevention of waste as herein defined, and to allocate such production among or between tracts of land under separate ownership in such pool on a fair and equitable basis to the end that each such tract will be permitted to produce not more than its just and equitable share from the pool. The owners and producers of each discovery well located in a new field or pool shall certify to the Oil and Gas Board an itemized list of the expenses incurred in the actual drilling of such well. The Oil and Gas Board shall investigate such cost and shall certify the amount found by them to be correct. The discovery well shall not be liable to the restrictions of Sections 53-1-1 through 53-1-47, inclusive, and Sections 53-3-1 through 53-3-21, inclusive, until the cost of drilling such well shall have been recovered in oil or gas from said discovery well. Such cost having been recovered, the discovery well shall be subject to the terms of said sections as are other wells in the field.

To prevent, so far as is practicable, reasonably avoidable drainage from each developed unit which is not equalized by counter-drainage.

To require all of those making settlement with the owners of oil or gas interests to render statements to such owners showing the quantity and gravity purchased and the price per barrel of oil or one thousand (1,000) cubic feet of gas.

To require, either generally or with respect to particular areas, certificates of clearance in connection with the transportation or delivery of oil, gas or any product thereof.

To promulgate rules and regulations governing the safety of storage of gas, liquefied petroleum gases, refined hydrocarbons and/or oil in underground storage wells, but the jurisdiction of the State Oil and Gas Board regarding safety shall cease upon reaching header on flow line beyond associated wellhead facilities, which includes the wellhead, manual and automatic safety valves, automatic shut-in safety devices, flow lines from wellhead to header, brine lines, and tanks or pits and flares.

To make such determinations of oil and/or natural gas maximum lawful ceiling prices as allowed by federal or state law.

In order to carry out its duties and responsibilities as fixed by law, the board is authorized and empowered to purchase, own and operate automobiles in the number and in the manner specified in Section 25-1-85. The board is further authorized and empowered to purchase, in the manner specified by law, operate and maintain in good order the necessary and suitable equipment required to install a complete radio base station, including mobile units to be installed in automobiles owned by the board.

The board shall have the authority, and it shall be its duty, to promulgate official policies of the board.

The board shall continue to have the power to make rules, regulations and orders necessary to prevent and protect against discrimination in the purchase, production and sale of oil and gas and against the unratable withdrawal of same, including as provided in Statewide Rule 48.

Notwithstanding any other provision contained in the Laws of the State of Mississippi, the board shall have exclusive jurisdiction and authority, and it shall be its duty, to make, after notice and hearing as hereinafter provided, such reasonable rules, regulations, standards and orders, and to issue such permits as may be necessary, to regulate the use, management, manufacture, production, ownership, investigation and noncommercial disposal of oil field exploration and production waste in order to prevent, eliminate or reduce waste by pollution to acceptable levels in order to protect the public health, safety and the environment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 6132-10, 6132-10.5; Laws, 1932, ch. 117; Laws, 1948, ch. 256, § 6; Laws, 1956, ch. 163, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1970, ch. 301, § 1; Laws, 1975, ch. 419, § 1; Reenacted and amended, Laws, 1982, ch. 485, § 9; Laws, 1983, ch. 359, § 1, ch. 506, § 1; Reenacted, Laws, 1990, ch. 357, § 8; Reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 340, § 9; Laws, 1991, ch. 605 § 2; Laws, 1992, ch. 344 § 2; Laws, 1995, ch. 356, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 53-1-19.
Rules of procedure before board to be consistent with Title 25, Chapter 43; recording and preservation of proceedings.

The board shall prescribe its rules of order or procedure in hearings or other proceedings before it consistent with Title 25, Chapter 43. The board may provide for the recording and preservation of its proceedings by order entered on its minutes.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-11; Laws, 1948, ch. 256, § 7a; Laws, 1950, ch. 220, § 2; Laws, 1958, ch. 185, § 1a; Reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 485, § 10; Laws, 1988, ch. 431, § 1, Reenacted, Laws, 1990, ch. 357, § 9; Reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 340, § 10; Laws, 2007, ch. 325, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 53-1-21.
Public hearing.

No rule, regulation, or order and no change, renewal, or extension thereof, shall, in the absence of an emergency, be made by the board except after a public hearing upon at least ten (10) days’ notice, which notice may be given by publication in some newspaper of general circulation in the state and also in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or counties in which pools are located, in the manner and form as may be prescribed by the board, or by such other method as may be prescribed by the board by general rule. Such public hearing shall be held at such time and at such place as may be prescribed by the board, and any person having any interest in the subject matter shall be entitled to be heard.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-12; Laws, 1948, ch. 256, § 7b; Laws, 1950, ch. 220, § 2; Laws, 1958, ch. 185, § 1b; Reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 485, § 11; Reenacted, Laws, 1990, ch. 357, § 10; Reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 340, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved March 11, 1991).

§ 53-1-23.
Emergency rules, regulations, or orders.

In the event an emergency is found to exist by the board which, in its judgment, requires the making, changing, renewal, or extension of a rule, regulation, or order without first having a hearing, such emergency rule, regulation, or order shall have the same validity as if a hearing with respect to the same had been held after due notice. The emergency rule, regulation or order permitted by this section shall remain in force no longer than forty-five (45) days from its effective date, and, in any event, it shall expire when the rule, regulation, or order made after due notice and hearing with respect to the subject matter of such emergency rule, regulation or order becomes effective.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-13; Laws, 1948, ch. 256, § 7c; Laws, 1950, ch. 220, § 2; Laws, 1958, ch. 185, § 1c; Reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 485, § 12; Reenacted, Laws, 1990, ch. 357, § 11; Reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 340, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved March 11, 1991).

§ 53-1-25.
Notice and service of process.

In any instance the board may give notice by personal service, in which event written notice thereof may be issued by any member of the board or by the supervisor, and service thereof may be made as provided by the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-14; Laws, 1948, ch. 256, § 7d; Laws, 1950, ch. 220, § 2; Laws, 1958, ch. 185, § 1d; Reenacted without changes, Laws, 1982, ch. 485, § 13; Reenacted and amended, Laws, 1990, ch. 357, § 13; Reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 340, § 13; Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 115, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 53-1-27.
Record of rules, regulations and orders.

All rules, regulations, and orders made by the board shall be in writing and shall be entered in full by the secretary of the board in a book to be kept for such purpose by the board, which shall be a public record and open to inspection at all times during reasonable office hours. A copy of any rule, regulation, or order, certified by a member of the board, or the secretary thereof, shall be received in evidence in all courts of this state with the same effect as the original.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-15; Laws, 1948, ch. 256, § 7e; Laws, 1950, ch. 220, § 2; Laws, 1958, ch. 185, § 1e; Reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 485, § 14; Reenacted, Laws, 1990, ch. 357, § 14; Reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 340, § 14, eff from and after passage (approved March 11, 1991).

§ 53-1-29.
Request for hearing.

Any interested person shall have the right to have the board call a hearing for the purpose of taking action in respect to any matter within the jurisdiction of the board by making a request therefor in writing. Upon the receipt of any such request, the board promptly shall call a hearing thereon, and, after such hearing and with all convenient speed, and in any event within thirty (30) days after the conclusion of such hearing, shall take such action with regard to the subject matter thereof as it may deem appropriate.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-16; Laws, 1948, ch. 256, § 7f; Laws, 1950, ch. 220, § 2; Laws, 1958, ch. 185, § 1f; Reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 485, § 15; Reenacted, Laws, 1990, ch. 357, § 15; Reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 340, § 15, eff from and after passage (approved March 11, 1991).

§ 53-1-31.
Records; inspection by public.

The permanent records of the board shall be available, upon request, for inspection by the public in accordance with the established procedures of the office of the Oil and Gas Board and during reasonable office hours. All well logs, casing records, compiled data and other information shall be properly indexed and suitably recorded in the permanent records of the board.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-17; Laws, 1932, ch. 117; Laws, 1948, ch. 256, § 7g; Laws, 1950, ch. 220, § 2; Laws, 1958, ch. 185, § 1g; Laws, 1982, ch. 485, § 16; Reenacted, Laws, 1990, ch. 357, § 16; Reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 340, § 16, eff from and after passage (approved March 11, 1991).

§ 53-1-33.
Supervisor and his representatives to have access to all wells.

The supervisor and his representatives or employees shall have access to all wells drilled for oil or gas at any and all times, and any person operating or controlling any lease or property shall permit them to go upon same and inspect any and all wells and well records, while the wells are being drilled and at all other times, and to have such control of such property, machinery and appliances as may be requisite to gauge the wells. However, the well records of any well drilled in unproved territory shall not be subject to such inspection until thirty (30) days after the completion of the well.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-18; Laws, 1932, ch. 117; Laws, 1948, ch. 256, § 8a; Laws, 1982, ch. 485, § 17; Reenacted, Laws, 1990, ch. 357, § 17; Reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 340, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved March 11, 1991).

§ 53-1-35.
Subpoena of witnesses; contempt.

The board, or any member thereof, or the supervisor is hereby empowered to issue subpoenas for witnesses, to require their attendance and the giving of testimony before the board, and to require the production of such books, papers and records in any proceeding before the board as may be material upon questions lawfully before the board. Such subpoenas shall be served by the sheriff or any other officer authorized by law to serve process in this state. No person shall be excused from attending and testifying, or from producing books, papers and records before the board or a court, or from obedience to the subpoena of the board, or any member thereof, or the supervisor or a court on the ground or for the reason that the testimony or evidence, documentary or otherwise, required of him may tend to incriminate him or subject him to a penalty or forfeiture. However, nothing herein contained shall be construed as requiring any person to produce any books, papers or records, or to testify in response to any inquiry, not pertinent to some question lawfully before such board or court for determination. No natural person shall be subject to criminal prosecution or to any penalty or forfeiture for or on account of any transaction, matter, or thing concerning which he may be required to testify or produce evidence, documentary or otherwise, before the board or court, or in obedience to any such subpoena, but no person testifying shall be exempt from prosecution and punishment for perjury committed in so testifying.

In case of failure or refusal on the part of any person to comply with any subpoena issued by the board, or any member thereof, or the supervisor, or in case of the refusal of any witness to testify or answer to any matter regarding which he may be lawfully interrogated, the judge of the chancery court of the county of the residence of such person, if a resident of Mississippi, or the judge of the chancery court of the county in which the land lies, or any portion thereof, out of which the controversy arises, if such person is not a resident of the State of Mississippi, on application of the board, or any member thereof, or the supervisor, may, in termtime or vacation, issue an attachment for such person and compel him to comply with such subpoena and to attend before the board and produce such documents, and give his testimony upon such matters, as may be lawfully required; and such court shall have the power to punish for contempt as in case of disobedience of like subpoenas issued by or from such court, or for a refusal to testify therein.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-19; Laws, 1948, ch. 256, § 8b, c; Reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 485, § 18; Laws, 1988, ch. 431, § 2; Reenacted, Laws, 1990, ch. 357, § 18; Reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 340, § 18, eff from and after passage (approved March 11, 1991).

§ 53-1-37.
Service of notices and process upon board.

All notices or other process authorized or required to be served upon the board may be served upon the supervisor or upon any member of the board.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6132-20; Laws, 1948, ch. 256, § 8d; Reenacted without a change, Laws, 1982, ch. 485, § 19; Reenacted, Laws, 1990, ch. 357; Reenacted without change, Laws, 1991, ch. 340, § 19, eff from and after passage (approved March 11, 1991).